Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,154
Workers' compensation insurance; discount or dividend; how apportioned.

An association may apportion any discount or dividend received on insurance policies obtained pursuant to section 44-3,151 among the covered members according to a formula adopted in the plan of operation of the association.

Laws 1996, LB 515, § 4.